Wyoming, session 2026, HB0035.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) Correctional forestry crew supervisors,
correctional crew supervisors, correctional forestry crew
managers and any other person in a wildland firefighting
occupation employed by the state forestry division of the
office of state lands and investments shall:
(i) Receive a differential for firefighting work
deemed hazardous in accordance with federal standards for
firefighter hazard pay and subsection (b) of this section;
and
(ii) Be eligible for paid time off in accordance
with federal standards for firefighter paid time off and
subsection (b) of this section.
(b) For purposes of this section, the office of state
lands and investments shall monitor federal standards for
firefighting work deemed hazardous and firefighter paid
time off when determining compensation under subsection (a)
of this section, but those federal standards shall not be
binding on the office of state lands and investments.
Section 2. There is appropriated four hundred twenty-
two thousand five hundred dollars ($422,500.00) from the
general fund to the office of state lands and investments
for purposes of providing hazard pay pursuant to section
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0035
ENROLLED ACT NO. 4, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
1(a)(i) of this act. This appropriation shall be for the
period beginning May 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2028. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation be included in the
standard budget for the office of state lands and
investments for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
Section 3. The department of administration and
information and the office of state lands and investments
shall promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0035
ENROLLED ACT NO. 4, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective May 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3